District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.88b

Authority for procurement of goods and services.

The Attorney General shall carry out procurement of goods and services for the Office of the Attorney General through a procurement office or division. The procurement office or division shall operate independently of, and shall not be governed by, the Office of Contracting and Procurement established pursuant to Chapter 3A of Title 2 [§ 2-351.01 et seq.], except as provided in § 2-352.01(b).

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 108b
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1032(b), 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).